Washington statutes.
RCW 18.321.070

Military families.

An active military member or their spouse shall designate a home state where the individual has a multistate license. The individual may retain their home state designation during the period the service member is on active duty.

[ 2024 c 176 s 9.]

NOTES:

Intent—2024 c 176: See note following RCW 18.321.005.